Hawaii statutes.
§352-15 Recreational and program
activities. The director shall provide the opportunity for the recreation
of those persons committed to the facilities. Work programs for such persons
shall be established and may include farming, sewing, plant nursery, and animal
husbandry. [L 1980, c 303, pt of §8(1)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next